Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,179
Beekeeping; director; enforcement powers; county attorney or Attorney General; duties; violations; penalty.

(1) If the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any of the provisions of the Nebraska Apiary Act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, an order may be entered requiring such person to appear before the director and show cause why an order should not be entered requiring such person to cease and desist from the violations charged. Such order shall set forth the alleged violations, fix the time and place of the hearing, and provide for notice to be given at least twenty days before the date of such hearing. After such hearing, if the director finds such person to be in violation, the director shall enter an order requiring such person to cease and desist from the specific acts, practices, or omissions. Such order shall be a final order. Any person aggrieved may appeal the order. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(2) The director may apply for a restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or a mandatory injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate the Nebraska Apiary Act, the rules and regulations, or a final order of the director. The district court of the county where the violation is occurring or is about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

(3) It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which any violation occurs or is about to occur when notified by the department of a violation or a threatened violation to institute appropriate proceedings either criminal, injunctive, or both without delay.

(4) Any person violating any of the provisions of the Nebraska Apiary Act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1929, c. 9, § 15, p. 82;

C.S.1929, § 81-2715;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,179;

Laws 1961, c. 426, § 3, p. 1334;

Laws 1965, c. 548, § 8, p. 1761;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 284;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 52;

Laws 1994, LB 1071, § 15.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.